Florida, session 2026, HB199.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (4) and (8) of section 394.47891,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
394.47891 Veterans treatment court programs.—
(4) ADMISSION.—A defendant who meets the eligibility
requirements provided in under subsection (8) may be admitted to
a veterans treatment court program at any stage of a criminal
proceeding. A defendant seeking to participate in a veterans
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb199 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 199 2026 Legislature
treatment court program must submit an application to the state
attorney. The state attorney must review each application and
determine whether the defendant meets the eligibility
requirements in subsection (8).
(8) ELIGIBILITY.—
(a) A defendant may participate in a veterans treatment
court program if he or she is approved by the state attorney, in
consultation with the court, in consultation with the
multidisciplinary team, and meets the following criteria:
1. The defendant has a service-related mental health
condition, service-related traumatic brain injury, service-
related substance use disorder, or service-related psychological
problem or has experienced military sexual trauma.
2. The defendant's participation in the veterans treatment
court program is in the interest of justice and of benefit to
the defendant and the community.
(b) In making the determination under subparagraph (a)2.,
the state attorney, in consultation with the court, in
consultation with the multidisciplinary team, must consider:
1. The nature and circumstances of the offense charged.
2. The special characteristics or circumstances of the
defendant and any victim or alleged victim, including any
recommendation of the victim or alleged victim.
3. The defendant's criminal history and whether the
defendant previously participated in a veterans treatment court
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb199 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 199 2026 Legislature
program or similar program.
4. Whether the defendant's needs exceed the treatment
resources available to the veterans treatment court program.
5. The impact on the community of the defendant's
participation and treatment in the veterans treatment court
program.
6. Recommendations of any law enforcement agency involved
in investigating or arresting the defendant, and any
recommendation of the state attorney.
7. If the defendant owes restitution, the likelihood of
payment during the defendant's participation in the veterans
treatment court program.
8. Any mitigating circumstances.
9. Any other circumstances reasonably related to the
defendant's case.
Section 2. Subsection (9) is added to section 948.01,
Florida Statutes, to read:
948.01 When court may place defendant on probation or into
community control.—
(9)(a) Notwithstanding s. 921.0024 and effective for
offenses committed on or after July 1, 2026, the sentencing
court may place the defendant into a postadjudicatory veterans
treatment court program if the offense is a nonviolent felony,
the defendant is a servicemember or veteran as defined in s.
394.47891(2), and the defendant is otherwise qualified to
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb199 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 199 2026 Legislature
participate in a veterans treatment court program under s.
394.47891(8). Satisfactory completion of the program must be a
condition of the defendant's probation or community control. As
used in this subsection, the term "nonviolent felony" means a
third degree felony violation under chapter 810 or any other
felony offense that is not a forcible felony as defined in s.
776.08.
(b) The defendant must be fully advised of the purpose of
the veterans treatment court program, and the defendant must
agree to enter the program. The original sentencing court shall
relinquish jurisdiction of the defendant's case to the
postadjudicatory veterans treatment court program until the
defendant is no longer active in the program, the case is
returned to the sentencing court due to the defendant's
termination from the program for failure to comply with the
terms of the program, or the defendant's sentence is completed.
(c) A defendant sentenced to a postadjudicatory veterans
treatment court program and who, while a veterans treatment
court program participant, is the subject of a violation of
probation or community control under s. 948.06 shall have the
violation of probation or community control heard by the judge
presiding over the postadjudicatory veterans treatment court
program. The judge shall dispose of any such violation, after a
hearing on or admission of the violation, as he or she deems
100 appropriate if the resulting sentence or conditions are lawful.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb199 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 199 2026 Legislature
101 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb199 -02-er